Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-122
Attachment; appraisers; compensation.

In all cases of attachment, when the property ordered attached consists of merchandise or miscellaneous goods, and time is absolutely necessary to properly appraise the same as required by law, the residents of the county, summoned to appraise said property, shall be entitled to a just and fair compensation for their time, labor and mileage, when necessary to go any distance exceeding one mile, and the sheriff or other officer is empowered to demand and collect the same as other fees; Provided, travel expenses by way of mileage shall be computed at the rate per mile as prescribed in section 33-117.

Laws 1871, § 2, p. 117;

R.S.1913, § 2447;

C.S.1922, § 2387;

C.S.1929, § 33-126;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 8, p. 388;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-126;

R.S.1943, § 33-122.

Attachment, fees for services of officers, see section 25-1046.